District of Columbia statutes.
31-3162

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

History

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-360, § 303, 58 DCR 896